North Dakota, session 69, HB1137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 6 of section 39-01-15 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
6. A certificate issued under this section must be hung from the rearview mirror or placed on the
dashboard of the motor vehicle whenever the vehicle is occupying a space reserved for the
mobility impaired and is being used by a mobility-impaired individual or another individual for
the purposes of transporting the mobility-impaired individual. No part of the certificate may be
obscured. A fee of five dollars may be imposed for a violation of this subsection.

H. B. NO. 1137 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1137.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State